Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3901
Act, how cited.

Sections 30-3901
to 30-3923 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship
and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 5.